Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.455

Destruction of employee records authorized if consistent with other laws.

RCW 41.06.450 does not prohibit an agency from destroying identifying information in records relating to employee misconduct or alleged misconduct if the agency deems the action is consistent with the policy expressed in RCW 41.06.450 and in chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 281; 1982 c 208 s 11.]